Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1907
Eligible student,
defined.

Eligible student means an undergraduate
student who:

(1) Is enrolled in an eligible postsecondary educational institution;

(2) Has applied for federal financial aid through the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid for the applicable award year and has
an expected family contribution which
is equal to or less than one hundred ten percent of the maximum expected family
contribution to qualify for a Federal Pell Grant in that award year;

(3) Is a resident student who is domiciled in Nebraska as
provided by section 85-502; and

(4) Complies with all other provisions of the Nebraska Opportunity
Grant Act and its rules and regulations.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 7;

Laws 2013, LB331, § 2.